Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 2. CHILD IN RELATION TO THE FAMILY

SUBTITLE A. LIMITATIONS OF MINORITY

CHAPTER 33. NOTICE OF AND CONSENT TO ABORTION

Sec. 33.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Abortion" has the meaning assigned by Section 245.002, Health and Safety Code. This definition, as applied in this chapter, may not be construed to limit a minor's access to contraceptives.

(2) "Fetus" means an individual human organism from fertilization until birth.

(3) "Guardian" means a court-appointed guardian of the person of the minor.

(3-a) "Medical emergency" has the meaning assigned by Section 171.002, Health and Safety Code.

(4) "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine in this state.

(5) "Unemancipated minor" includes a minor who:

(A) is unmarried; and

(B) has not had the disabilities of minority removed under Chapter 31.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 441 (S.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 33.002. PARENTAL NOTICE.

(a) A physician may not perform an abortion on a pregnant unemancipated minor unless:

(1) the physician performing the abortion gives at least 48 hours actual notice, in person or by telephone, of the physician's intent to perform the abortion to:

(A) a parent of the minor, if the minor has no managing conservator or guardian; or

(B) a court-appointed managing conservator or guardian;

(2) the physician who is to perform the abortion receives an order issued by a court under Section 33.003 or 33.004 authorizing the minor to consent to the abortion as provided by Section 33.003 or 33.004; or

(3) the physician who is to perform the abortion:

(A) concludes that a medical emergency exists;

(B) certifies in writing to the Department of State Health Services and in the patient's medical record the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment that a medical emergency exists; and

(C) provides the notice required by Section 33.0022.

(b) If a person to whom notice may be given under Subsection (a)(1) cannot be notified after a reasonable effort, a physician may perform an abortion if the physician gives 48 hours constructive notice, by certified mail, restricted delivery, sent to the last known address, to the person to whom notice may be given under Subsection (a)(1). The period under this subsection begins when the notice is mailed. If the person required to be notified is not notified within the 48-hour period, the abortion may proceed even if the notice by mail is not received.

(c) The requirement that 48 hours actual notice be provided under this section may be waived by an affidavit of:

(1) a parent of the minor, if the minor has no managing conservator or guardian; or

(2) a court-appointed managing conservator or guardian.

(d) A physician may execute for inclusion in the minor's medical record an affidavit stating that, according to the best information and belief of the physician, notice or constructive notice has been provided as required by this section. Execution of an affidavit under this subsection creates a presumption that the requirements of this section have been satisfied.

(e) The Department of State Health Services shall prepare a form to be used for making the certification required by Subsection (a)(3)(B).

(f) A certification required by Subsection (a)(3)(B) is confidential and privileged and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or to discovery, subpoena, or other legal process. Personal or identifying information about the minor, including her name, address, or social security number, may not be included in a certification under Subsection (a)(3)(B). The physician must keep the medical records on the minor in compliance with the rules adopted by the Texas Medical Board under Section 153.003, Occupations Code.

(g) A physician who intentionally performs an abortion on a pregnant unemancipated minor in violation of this section commits an offense. An offense under this subsection is punishable by a fine not to exceed $10,000. In this subsection, "intentionally" has the meaning assigned by Section 6.03(a), Penal Code.

(h) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the minor falsely represented her age or identity to the physician to be at least 18 years of age by displaying an apparently valid proof of identity and age described by Subsection (k) such that a reasonable person under similar circumstances would have relied on the representation. The defense does not apply if the physician is shown to have had independent knowledge of the minor's actual age or identity or failed to use due diligence in determining the minor's age or identity. In this subsection, "defense" has the meaning and application assigned by Section 2.03, Penal Code.

(i) In relation to the trial of an offense under this section in which the conduct charged involves a conclusion made by the physician under Subsection (a)(3)(A), the defendant may seek a hearing before the Texas Medical Board on whether the physician's conduct was necessary because of a medical emergency. The findings of the Texas Medical Board under this subsection are admissible on that issue in the trial of the defendant. Notwithstanding any other reason for a continuance provided under the Code of Criminal Procedure or other law, on motion of the defendant, the court shall delay the beginning of the trial for not more than 30 days to permit a hearing under this subsection to take place.

(j) A physician shall use due diligence to determine that any woman on which the physician performs an abortion who claims to have reached the age of majority or to have had the disabilities of minority removed has, in fact, reached the age of majority or has had the disabilities of minority removed.

(k) For the purposes of this section, "due diligence" includes requesting proof of identity and age described by Section 2.005(b) or a copy of the court order removing disabilities of minority.

(l) If proof of identity and age cannot be provided, the physician shall provide information on how to obtain proof of identity and age. If the woman is subsequently unable to obtain proof of identity and age and the physician chooses to perform the abortion, the physician shall document that proof of identity and age was not obtained and report to the Department of State Health Services that proof of identity and age was not obtained for the woman on whom the abortion was performed. The department shall report annually to the legislature regarding the number of abortions performed without proof of identity and age.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.741, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.0021. CONSENT REQUIRED. A physician may not perform an abortion in violation of Section 164.052(a)(19), Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.0022. MEDICAL EMERGENCY NOTIFICATION; AFFIDAVIT FOR MEDICAL RECORD. (a) If the physician who is to perform the abortion concludes under Section 33.002(a)(3)(A) that a medical emergency exists and that there is insufficient time to provide the notice required by Section 33.002 or obtain the consent required by Section 33.0021, the physician shall make a reasonable effort to inform, in person or by telephone, the parent, managing conservator, or guardian of the unemancipated minor within 24 hours after the time a medical emergency abortion is performed on the minor of:

(1) the performance of the abortion; and

(2) the basis for the physician's determination that a medical emergency existed that required the performance of a medical emergency abortion without fulfilling the requirements of Section 33.002 or 33.0021.

(b) A physician who performs an abortion as described by Subsection (a), not later than 48 hours after the abortion is performed, shall send a written notice that a medical emergency occurred and the ability of the parent, managing conservator, or guardian to contact the physician for more information and medical records, to the last known address of the parent, managing conservator, or guardian by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested. The physician may rely on last known address information if a reasonable and prudent person, under similar circumstances, would rely on the information as sufficient evidence that the parent, managing conservator, or guardian resides at that address. The physician shall keep in the minor's medical record:

(1) the return receipt from the written notice; or

(2) if the notice was returned as undeliverable, the notice.

(c) A physician who performs an abortion on an unemancipated minor during a medical emergency as described by Subsection (a) shall execute for inclusion in the medical record of the minor an affidavit that explains the specific medical emergency that necessitated the immediate abortion.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.003. JUDICIAL APPROVAL. (a) A pregnant minor may file an application for a court order authorizing the minor to consent to the performance of an abortion without notification to and consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian.

(b) The application must be filed in:

(1) a county court at law, court having probate jurisdiction, or district court, including a family district court, in the minor's county of residence;

(2) if the minor's parent, managing conservator, or guardian is a presiding judge of a court described by Subdivision (1):

(A) a county court at law, court having probate jurisdiction, or district court, including a family district court, in a contiguous county; or

(B) a county court at law, court having probate jurisdiction, or district court, including a family district court, in the county where the minor intends to obtain the abortion;

(3) if the minor's county of residence has a population of less than 10,000:

(A) a court described by Subdivision (1);

(B) a county court at law, court having probate jurisdiction, or district court, including a family district court, in a contiguous county; or

(C) a county court at law, court having probate jurisdiction, or district court, including a family district court, in the county in which the facility at which the minor intends to obtain the abortion is located; or

(4) a county court at law, court having probate jurisdiction, or district court, including a family district court, in the county in which the facility at which the minor intends to obtain the abortion is located, if the minor is not a resident of this state.

(c) The application must:

(1) be made under oath;

(2) include:

(A) a statement that the minor is pregnant;

(B) a statement that the minor is unmarried, is under 18 years of age, and has not had her disabilities removed under Chapter 31;

(C) a statement that the minor wishes to have an abortion without the notification to and consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian;

(D) a statement as to whether the minor has retained an attorney and, if she has retained an attorney, the name, address, and telephone number of her attorney; and

(E) a statement about the minor's current residence, including the minor's physical address, mailing address, and telephone number; and

(3) be accompanied by the sworn statement of the minor's attorney under Subsection (r), if the minor has retained an attorney to assist the minor with filing the application under this section.

(d) The clerk of the court shall deliver a courtesy copy of the application made under this section to the judge who is to hear the application.

(e) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor who shall represent the best interest of the minor. If the minor has not retained an attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the minor. The guardian ad litem may not also serve as the minor's attorney ad litem.

(f) The court may appoint to serve as guardian ad litem:

(1) a person who may consent to treatment for the minor under Sections 32.001(a)(1)-(3);

(2) a psychiatrist or an individual licensed or certified as a psychologist under Chapter 501, Occupations Code;

(3) an appropriate employee of the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(4) a member of the clergy; or

(5) another appropriate person selected by the court.

(g) The court shall fix a time for a hearing on an application filed under Subsection (a) and shall keep a record of all testimony and other oral proceedings in the action.

(g-1) The pregnant minor must appear before the court in person and may not appear using videoconferencing, telephone conferencing, or other remote electronic means.

(h) The court shall rule on an application submitted under this section and shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law not later than 5 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date the application is filed with the court. On request by the minor, the court shall grant an extension of the period specified by this subsection. If a request for an extension is made, the court shall rule on an application and shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law not later than 5 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date the minor states she is ready to proceed to hearing. Proceedings under this section shall be given precedence over other pending matters to the extent necessary to assure that the court reaches a decision promptly, regardless of whether the minor is granted an extension under this subsection.

(i) The court shall determine by clear and convincing evidence, as described by Section 101.007, whether:

(1) the minor is mature and sufficiently well informed to make the decision to have an abortion performed without notification to or consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian; or

(2) the notification and attempt to obtain consent would not be in the best interest of the minor.

(i-1) In determining whether the minor meets the requirements of Subsection (i)(1), the court shall consider the experience, perspective, and judgment of the minor. The court may:

(1) consider all relevant factors, including:

(A) the minor's age;

(B) the minor's life experiences, such as working, traveling independently, or managing her own financial affairs; and

(C) steps taken by the minor to explore her options and the consequences of those options;

(2) inquire as to the minor's reasons for seeking an abortion;

(3) consider the degree to which the minor is informed about the state-published informational materials described by Chapter 171, Health and Safety Code; and

(4) require the minor to be evaluated by a licensed mental health counselor, who shall return the evaluation to the court for review within three business days.

(i-2) In determining whether the notification and the attempt to obtain consent would not be in the best interest of the minor, the court may inquire as to:

(1) the minor's reasons for not wanting to notify and obtain consent from a parent, managing conservator, or guardian;

(2) whether notification or the attempt to obtain consent may lead to physical or sexual abuse;

(3) whether the pregnancy was the result of sexual abuse by a parent, managing conservator, or guardian; and

(4) any history of physical or sexual abuse from a parent, managing conservator, or guardian.

(i-3) The court shall enter an order authorizing the minor to consent to the performance of the abortion without notification to and consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian and shall execute the required forms if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence, as defined by Section 101.007, that:

(1) the minor is mature and sufficiently well informed to make the decision to have an abortion performed without notification to or consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian; or

(2) the notification and attempt to obtain consent would not be in the best interest of the minor.

(j) If the court finds that the minor does not meet the requirements of Subsection (i-3), the court may not authorize the minor to consent to an abortion without the notification authorized under Section 33.002(a)(1) and consent under Section 33.0021.

(k) The court may not notify a parent, managing conservator, or guardian that the minor is pregnant or that the minor wants to have an abortion. The court proceedings shall be conducted in a manner that protects the confidentiality of the identity of the minor. The application and all other court documents pertaining to the proceedings are confidential and privileged and are not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or to discovery, subpoena, or other legal process. Confidential records pertaining to a minor under this subsection may be disclosed to the minor.

(l) An order of the court issued under this section is confidential and privileged and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or discovery, subpoena, or other legal process. The order may not be released to any person but the pregnant minor, the pregnant minor's guardian ad litem, the pregnant minor's attorney, the physician who is to perform the abortion, another person designated to receive the order by the minor, or a governmental agency or attorney in a criminal or administrative action seeking to assert or protect the interest of the minor. The supreme court may adopt rules to permit confidential docketing of an application under this section.

(l-1) The clerk of the court, at intervals prescribed by the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System, shall submit a report to the office that includes, for each case filed under this section:

(1) the case number and style;

(2) the applicant's county of residence;

(3) the court of appeals district in which the proceeding occurred;

(4) the date of filing;

(5) the date of disposition; and

(6) the disposition of the case.

(l-2) The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall annually compile and publish a report aggregating the data received under Subsections (l-1)(3) and (6). A report submitted under Subsection (l-1) is confidential and privileged and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or to discovery, subpoena, or other legal process. A report under this subsection must protect the confidentiality of:

(1) the identity of all minors and judges who are the subject of the report; and

(2) the information described by Subsection (l-1)(1).

(m) The clerk of the supreme court shall prescribe the application form to be used by the minor filing an application under this section.

(n) A filing fee is not required of and court costs may not be assessed against a minor filing an application under this section.

(o) A minor who has filed an application under this section may not withdraw or otherwise non-suit her application without the permission of the court.

(p) Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (q), a minor who has filed an application and has obtained a determination by the court as described by Subsection (i) may not initiate a new application proceeding and the prior proceeding is res judicata of the issue relating to the determination of whether the minor may or may not be authorized to consent to the performance of an abortion without notification to and consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian.

(q) A minor whose application is denied may subsequently submit an application to the court that denied the application if the minor shows that there has been a material change in circumstances since the time the court denied the application.

(r) An attorney retained by the minor to assist her in filing an application under this section shall fully inform himself or herself of the minor's prior application history, including the representations made by the minor in the application regarding her address, proper venue in the county in which the application is filed, and whether a prior application has been filed and initiated. If an attorney assists the minor in the application process in any way, with or without payment, the attorney representing the minor must attest to the truth of the minor's claims regarding the venue and prior applications in a sworn statement.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.742, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 110 (H.B. 841), Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.004. APPEAL. (a) A minor whose application under Section 33.003 is denied may appeal to the court of appeals having jurisdiction over civil matters in the county in which the application was filed. On receipt of a notice of appeal, the clerk of the court that denied the application shall deliver a copy of the notice of appeal and record on appeal to the clerk of the court of appeals. On receipt of the notice and record, the clerk of the court of appeals shall place the appeal on the docket of the court.

(b) The court of appeals shall rule on an appeal under this section not later than 5 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date the notice of appeal is filed with the court that denied the application. On request by the minor, the court shall grant an extension of the period specified by this subsection. If a request for an extension is made, the court shall rule on the appeal not later than 5 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date the minor states she is ready to proceed. Proceedings under this section shall be given precedence over other pending matters to the extent necessary to assure that the court reaches a decision promptly, regardless of whether the minor is granted an extension under this subsection.

(c) A ruling of the court of appeals issued under this section is confidential and privileged and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or discovery, subpoena, or other legal process. The ruling may not be released to any person but the pregnant minor, the pregnant minor's guardian ad litem, the pregnant minor's attorney, another person designated to receive the ruling by the minor, or a governmental agency or attorney in a criminal or administrative action seeking to assert or protect the interest of the minor. The supreme court may adopt rules to permit confidential docketing of an appeal under this section.

(c-1) Notwithstanding Subsection (c), the court of appeals may publish an opinion relating to a ruling under this section if the opinion is written in a way to preserve the confidentiality of the identity of the pregnant minor.

(d) The clerk of the supreme court shall prescribe the notice of appeal form to be used by the minor appealing a judgment under this section.

(e) A filing fee is not required of and court costs may not be assessed against a minor filing an appeal under this section.

(f) An expedited confidential appeal shall be available to any pregnant minor to whom a court of appeals denies an application to authorize the minor to consent to the performance of an abortion without notification to or consent of a parent, managing conservator, or guardian.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 6, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.005. AFFIDAVIT OF PHYSICIAN. (a) A physician may execute for inclusion in the minor's medical record an affidavit stating that, after reasonable inquiry, it is the belief of the physician that:

(1) the minor has made an application or filed a notice of an appeal with a court under this chapter;

(2) the deadline for court action imposed by this chapter has passed; and

(3) the physician has been notified that the court has not denied the application or appeal.

(b) A physician who in good faith has executed an affidavit under Subsection (a) may rely on the affidavit and may perform the abortion as if the court had issued an order granting the application or appeal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 33.006. GUARDIAN AD LITEM IMMUNITY. A guardian ad litem appointed under this chapter and acting in the course and scope of the appointment is not liable for damages arising from an act or omission of the guardian ad litem committed in good faith. The immunity granted by this section does not apply if the conduct of the guardian ad litem is committed in a manner described by Sections 107.009(b)(1)-(3).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 7.001, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 33.0065. RECORDS. The clerk of the court shall retain the records for each case before the court under this chapter in accordance with rules for civil cases and grant access to the records to the minor who is the subject of the proceeding.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 7, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.007. COSTS PAID BY STATE. (a) A court acting under Section 33.003 or 33.004 may issue an order requiring the state to pay:

(1) the cost of any attorney ad litem and any guardian ad litem appointed for the minor;

(2) notwithstanding Sections 33.003(n) and 33.004(e), the costs of court associated with the application or appeal; and

(3) any court reporter's fees incurred.

(b) An order issued under Subsection (a) must be directed to the comptroller, who shall pay the amount ordered from funds appropriated to the Texas Department of Health.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 33.008. PHYSICIAN'S DUTY TO REPORT ABUSE OF A MINOR; INVESTIGATION AND ASSISTANCE. (a) If a minor claims to have been physically or sexually abused or a physician or physician's agent has reason to believe that a minor has been physically or sexually abused, the physician or physician's agent shall immediately report the suspected abuse and the name of the abuser to the Department of Family and Protective Services and to a local law enforcement agency and shall refer the minor to the department for services or intervention that may be in the best interest of the minor. The local law enforcement agency shall respond and shall write a report within 24 hours of being notified of the alleged abuse. A report shall be made regardless of whether the local law enforcement agency knows or suspects that a report about the abuse may have previously been made.

(b) The appropriate local law enforcement agency and the Department of Family and Protective Services shall investigate suspected abuse reported under this section and, if warranted, shall refer the case to the appropriate prosecuting authority.

(c) When the local law enforcement agency responds to the report of physical or sexual abuse as required by Subsection (a), a law enforcement officer or appropriate agent from the Department of Family and Protective Services may take emergency possession of the minor without a court order to protect the health and safety of the minor as described by Chapter 262.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 110 (H.B. 841), Sec. 2, eff. May 21, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 8, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.0085. DUTY OF JUDGE OR JUSTICE TO REPORT ABUSE OF MINOR. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a judge or justice who, as a result of court proceedings conducted under Section 33.003 or 33.004, has reason to believe that a minor has been or may be physically or sexually abused shall:

(1) immediately report the suspected abuse and the name of the abuser to the Department of Family and Protective Services and to a local law enforcement agency; and

(2) refer the minor to the department for services or intervention that may be in the best interest of the minor.

(b) The appropriate local law enforcement agency and the Department of Family and Protective Services shall investigate suspected abuse reported under this section and, if warranted, shall refer the case to the appropriate prosecuting authority.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.009. OTHER REPORTS OF SEXUAL ABUSE OF A MINOR. A court or the guardian ad litem or attorney ad litem for the minor shall report conduct reasonably believed to violate Section 21.02, 22.011, 22.021, or 25.02, Penal Code, based on information obtained during a confidential court proceeding held under this chapter to:

(1) any local or state law enforcement agency;

(2) the Department of Family and Protective Services, if the alleged conduct involves a person responsible for the care, custody, or welfare of the child;

(3) the state agency that operates, licenses, certifies, or registers the facility in which the alleged conduct occurred, if the alleged conduct occurred in a facility operated, licensed, certified, or registered by a state agency; or

(4) an appropriate agency designated by the court.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.27, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 33.010. CONFIDENTIALITY. Notwithstanding any other law, information obtained by the Department of Family and Protective Services or another entity under Section 33.008, 33.0085, or 33.009 is confidential except to the extent necessary to prove a violation of Section 21.02, 22.011, 22.021, or 25.02, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.28, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 10, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.011. INFORMATION RELATING TO JUDICIAL BYPASS. The Texas Department of Health shall produce and distribute informational materials that explain the rights of a minor under this chapter. The materials must explain the procedures established by Sections 33.003 and 33.004 and must be made available in English and in Spanish. The material provided by the department shall also provide information relating to alternatives to abortion and health risks associated with abortion.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 33.012. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) A person who is found to have intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, or with gross negligence violated this chapter is liable to this state for a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 and not more than $10,000.

(b) Each performance or attempted performance of an abortion in violation of this chapter is a separate violation.

(c) A civil penalty may not be assessed against:

(1) a minor on whom an abortion is performed or attempted; or

(2) a judge or justice hearing a court proceeding conducted under Section 33.003 or 33.004.

(d) It is not a defense to an action brought under this section that the minor gave informed and voluntary consent.

(e) The attorney general shall bring an action to collect a penalty under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.013. CAPACITY TO CONSENT. An unemancipated minor does not have the capacity to consent to any action that violates this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 33.014. ATTORNEY GENERAL TO ENFORCE. The attorney general shall enforce this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 3994), Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2016.